Utah statutes.
48-1-31.   Right of partner to contribution from copartners after dissolution.

Where the dissolution is caused by the act, death, or bankruptcy of a partner each partner is liable to his copartners for his share of any liability created by any partner acting for the partnership as if the partnership had not been dissolved unless:

(1)  the dissolution being by act of any partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge of the dissolution;

(2)  the dissolution being by the death or bankruptcy of a partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge or notice of the death or bankruptcy; or

(3)  the liability is for a debt, obligation, or liability for which the partner is not liable under Subsection 48-1-12(2).



Amended by Chapter 61, 1994 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

